Hawaii statutes.
§444-24 Injunction. The contractors
license board may, in addition to any other remedies available, apply to a
circuit judge for a preliminary or permanent injunction restraining any person
from acting, or assuming to act, or advertising, as general engineering
contractor, general building contractor, or specialty contractor, without a
license previously obtained under and in compliance with this chapter and the
rules and regulations of the board, and upon hearing and for cause shown, the
judge may grant the preliminary or permanent injunction. [L 1965, c 13, §1;
Supp, §166A-23; HRS §444-24]

Rules of Court

Injunctions, see HRCP rule 65.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next